test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-TA-wîcihîw_gt-norm.yaml
      # 2Sg
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1SgO: ta-wîcihiyan
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+3SgO: ta-wîcihat
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1PlO: ta-wîcihiyâhk
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+3PlO: ta-wîcihacik
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: ta-wîcihimat
      # PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+XO: PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+XO

      # 3Sg
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1SgO: ta-wîcihiyan
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+2SgO: ta-wîcihisk
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1PlO: ta-wîcihiyâhk
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+1PlO: ta-wîcihikoyâhk
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+1PlO+Var/East: ta-wîcihiyamiht
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+12PlO: ta-wîcihikoyahk
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+12PlO+Var/East: ta-wîcihitahk
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+2PlO: ta-wîcihikoyîk
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+2PlO+Var/East: ta-wîcihitîk
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+3PlO: ta-wîcihacik
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: ta-wîcihimat
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+5Sg/PlO: ta-wîcihimât
      # PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+XO: PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+XO

      # 1Pl
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+2SgO: ta-wîcihitâhk
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+3SgO: ta-wîcihâyâhk
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+3SgO+Var/East: ta-wîcihâkiht
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+2PlO: ta-wîcihitâhk
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+3PlO: ta-wîcihâyâhkwâw
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+3PlO+Var/East: ta-wîcihakihcik
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+4Sg/PlO: ta-wîcihimâyâhk
      # PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+XO: PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+XO

      # 12Pl
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+12Pl+3SgO: ta-wîcihâyahk
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+12Pl+3SgO+Var/East: ta-wîcihahk
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+12Pl+3PlO: ta-wîcihâyahkwâw
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+12Pl+3PlO+Var/East: ta-wîcihahkwâw
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+12Pl+4Sg/PlO: ta-wîcihimâyahk
      # PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+12Pl+XO: PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+12Pl+XO

      # 2Pl
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+1SgO: ta-wîcihiyîk
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+3SgO: ta-wîcihâyîk
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+1PlO: ta-wîcihiyâhk
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+3PlO: ta-wîcihâyîkwâw
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+3PlO+Var/East: ta-wîcihâyîkok
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+4Sg/PlO: ta-wîcihimâyîk
      # PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+XO: PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+XO

      # 3Pl
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+1SgO: [ta-wîcihitwâw, ta-wîcihicik]
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+2SgO: ta-wîcihiskwâw
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+1PlO: ta-wîcihikoyâhkwâw
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+1PlO+Var/East: ta-wîcihiyamihcik
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+12PlO: ta-wîcihikoyahkwâw
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+12PlO+Var/East: ta-wîcihitahkwâw
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+2PlO: ta-wîcihikoyîkwâw
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+2PlO+Var/East: ta-wîcihitîkwâw
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+4Sg/PlO: ta-wîcihâcik
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+5Sg/PlO: ta-wîcihimâcik
      # PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+XO: PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+XO

      # 4Sg/Pl
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+1SgO: ta-wîcihimit
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+2SgO: ta-wîcihimisk
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+3SgO: ta-wîcihikot
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+1PlO: ta-wîcihikoyâhk
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+12PlO: ta-wîcihikoyahk
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+2PlO: ta-wîcihikoyîk
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+3PlO: ta-wîcihikocik
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: ta-wîcihâthit
      # PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+XO: PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+XO

      # 5Sg/Pl
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+5Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO: ta-wîcihikothit

      # X
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+1SgO: ta-wîcihikawiyân
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+2SgO: ta-wîcihikawiyan
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+3SgO: ta-wîcihiht
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+1PlO: ta-wîcihikawiyâhk
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+12PlO: ta-wîcihikawiyahk
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+2PlO: ta-wîcihikawiyîk
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+3PlO: ta-wîcihihcik
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+4Sg/PlO: ta-wîcihimiht
      

      # Fut # Cond

      # 1Sg
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Sg+2SgO: wîcihitâni
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Sg+3SgO: wîcihaki
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Sg+2PlO: wîcihitahkwâwi
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Sg+3PlO: wîcihakwâwi
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Sg+4Sg/PlO: wîcihimaki
      # wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Sg+XO: wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Sg+XO

      # 2Sg
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Sg+1SgO: wîcihiyani
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Sg+3SgO: wîcihaci
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Sg+1PlO: wîcihiyâhki
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Sg+3PlO: wîcihatwâwi
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: wîcihimaci
      # wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Sg+XO: wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Sg+XO

      # 3Sg
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Sg+1SgO: wîcihiyani
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Sg+1PlO: wîcihiyâhki
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+1PlO: wîcihikoyâhki
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+1PlO+Var/East: wîcihitahkwâwi
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+12PlO: wîcihikoyahki
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+12PlO+Var/East: wîcihiyamihci
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+2PlO: wîcihikoyîko
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+2PlO+Var/East: wîcihitîko
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Sg+3PlO: wîcihatwâwi
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: wîcihimaci
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+5Sg/PlO: wîcihimâci
      # wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Sg+XO: wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Sg+XO

      # 1Pl
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Pl+2SgO: wîcihitâhki
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Pl+3SgO: wîcihâyâhki
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Pl+3SgO+Var/East: wîcihakihci
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Pl+2PlO: wîcihitâhki
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Pl+3PlO: wîcihâyâhkwâwi
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Pl+3PlO+Var/East: wîcihakihci
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Pl+4Sg/PlO: wîcihimâyâhki
      # wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Pl+XO: wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Pl+XO

      # 12Pl
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+12Pl+3SgO: wîcihâyahki
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+12Pl+3SgO+Var/East: wîcihahki
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+12Pl+3PlO: wîcihâyahkwâwi
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+12Pl+3PlO+Var/East: wîcihahkwayak
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+12Pl+4Sg/PlO: wîcihimâyahki
      # wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+12Pl+XO: wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+12Pl+XO

      # 2Pl
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Pl+1SgO: wîcihiyîko
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Pl+3SgO: wîcihâyîko
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Pl+1PlO: wîcihiyâhki
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Pl+3PlO: wîcihâyîkwâwi
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Pl+3PlO+Var/East: wîcihayîko
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Pl+4Sg/PlO: wîcihimâyîko
      # wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Pl+XO: wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Pl+XO

      # 3Pl
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+1SgO: wîcihitwâwi
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+2SgO: wîcihiskwâwi
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+1PlO: wîcihikoyâhkwâwi
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+1PlO+Var/East: wîcihitahkwâwi
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+12PlO: wîcihikoyahkwâwi
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+12PlO+Var/East: wîcihitahkwâwi
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+2PlO: wîcihikoyîkwâwi
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+2PlO+Var/East: wîcihitîko
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+4Sg/PlO: wîcihâtwâwi
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+5Sg/PlO: wîcihimâtwâwi
      # wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+XO: wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+XO

      # 4Sg/Pl
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+1SgO: wîcihimici
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+2SgO: wîcihimiski
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+3SgO: wîcihikoci
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+1PlO: wîcihikoyâhki
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+12PlO: wîcihikoyahki
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+2PlO: wîcihikoyîko
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+3PlO: wîcihikotwâwi
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: wîcihâthici
      # wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+XO: wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+XO

      # 5Sg/Pl
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+5Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO: wîcihikothici

      # X
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+X+1SgO: wîcihikawiyâni
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+X+2SgO: wîcihikawiyani
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+X+3SgO: wîcihihci
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+X+1PlO: wîcihikawiyâhki
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+X+12PlO: wîcihikawiyahki
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+X+2PlO: wîcihikawiyîko
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+X+3PlO: wîcihihtwâwi
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+X+4Sg/PlO: wîcihimihci
      

      # Imp # Imm

      # 2Sg
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+1SgO: wîcihin
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+1PlO: wîcihinân
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+3SgO: wîcih
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+3PlO: wîcihik

      # 12Pl
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+12Pl+3SgO: wîcihâtân
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+12Pl+3PlO: wîcihâtânik

      # 2Pl
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Pl+1SgO: wîcihik
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Pl+1PlO: wîcihinân
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Pl+3SgO: wîcihihk
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Pl+3PlO: wîcihihkwâw
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Pl+3PlO+Var/East: wîcihik
      

      # Imp # Del

      # 2Sg
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Sg+1SgO: wîcihîhkan
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Sg+1PlO: wîcihîhkâhk
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Sg+3SgO: wîcihâhkan
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Sg+3PlO: wîcihâhkanik

      # 12Pl
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Imp+Del+12Pl+3SgO: wîcihâhkahk
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Imp+Del+12Pl+3PlO: wîcihâhkahkik
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Imp+Del+12Pl+3PlO+Var/East: wîcihâhkanik

      # 2Pl
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Pl+1SgO: wîcihîhkîk
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Pl+1PlO: wîcihîhkâhk
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Pl+3SgO: wîcihâhkîk
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Pl+3PlO: wîcihâhkîkwâw
      
